Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.10.070

Restated articles of incorporation.

(1) Any officer of the corporation may restate its articles of incorporation at any time.

(2) A restatement may include one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation. If the restatement includes an amendment not requiring shareholder approval, it must be adopted by the board of directors. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring shareholder approval, it must be adopted in accordance with RCW 23B.10.030.

(3) If the board of directors submits a restatement for shareholder approval, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles of incorporation.

(4) A corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation together with a certificate setting forth:

(a) If the restatement does not include an amendment to the articles of incorporation, a statement to that effect;

(b) If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles of incorporation not requiring shareholder approval, a statement that the board of directors adopted the restatement and the date of such adoption;

(c) If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles of incorporation requiring shareholder approval, the information required by RCW 23B.10.060; and

(d) Both the articles of restatement and the certificate must be executed.

(5) Duly adopted restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to them.

(6) The secretary of state may certify restated articles of incorporation, as the articles of incorporation currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (4) of this section.

[ 2009 c 189 s 33; 1991 c 72 s 36; 1989 c 165 s 126.]